Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4847
Reopening liquidation.

After the liquidation proceeding has been terminated and the liquidator discharged, the director or other interested party may at any time petition the district court of Lancaster County to reopen the proceedings for good cause, including the discovery of additional assets. If the court is satisfied that there is justification for reopening, it shall so order.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 47.